Massachusetts, session 194th, H178.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 94G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (d) of section 3 in its entirety and inserting
in its place thereof the following:-
(d) No municipality shall require a host community agreement (HCA) as a condition for
the licensing, operation, or approval of any cannabis cultivation establishment within its
jurisdiction. Cannabis cultivators shall be subject to all applicable state laws and regulations but
shall not be required to enter into separate agreements with municipalities beyond the
requirements of state law.
SECTION 2. Chapter 64H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following:-
Section 6B. Local Value Added Tax on Cannabis Cultivation Sales
of 2

(a) In addition to the state sales tax imposed under section 2 of chapter 64H, there shall
be an additional local value added tax (VAT) of 1% on the sale of completed cannabis goods by
a licensed cannabis cultivation facility to licensed cannabis retailers in any municipality within
the commonwealth. The tax shall be calculated based on the value added to the goods during the
cultivation process.
(b) The local value added tax shall be collected by the cultivator at the point of sale or
transfer of completed goods and remitted to the department of revenue, which shall distribute the
funds to the appropriate municipality.
(c) The 1% local VAT shall be in addition to any local sales tax and shall be applied to
the value of completed cannabis products sold as adult-use cannabis products. Medical marijuana
products shall be exempt.
SECTION 3. The department of revenue shall promulgate regulations regarding VAT
collection and distribution within 90 days of the effective date of this act.
of 2